Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1823.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1403(c)(2)(i)(E) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1403. Establishment of State Gaming Fund and net slot machine revenue distribution.* * *(c) Transfers and distributions.--The department shall:* * *(2) From the local share assessment established in subsection (b), make quarterly distributions among the counties hosting a licensed facility in accordance with the following schedule:(i) If the licensed facility is a Category 1 licensed facility that is located at a harness racetrack and the county, including a home rule county, in which 12345678910111213141516171819 the licensed facility is located is:* * *(E) A county of the fourth class: [2% of the gross terminal revenue from each such licensed facility shall be distributed as follows:(I) The department shall make distributions directly to each municipality within the county, except the host municipality, by using a formula equal to the sum of $25,000 plus $10 per resident of the municipality using the most recent population figures provided by the Department of Community and Economic Development, provided, however, that the amount so distributed to any municipality shall not exceed 50% of its total budget for fiscal year 2009 or 2013, whichever is greater, adjusted for inflation in subsequent fiscal years by an amount not to exceed an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying any upward percentage change in the Consumer Price Index immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect. Distributions to a municipality in accordance with this subclause shall be deposited into a special fund which shall be established by the municipality. The governing body of the municipality shall have the right to draw upon the special fund for any lawful purpose provided that the municipality identifies the fund as the source of the expenditure. Each municipality shall annually submit a report to the Department of Community 20250HB1823PN2245 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Economic Development detailing the amount and purpose of each expenditure made from the special fund during the prior fiscal year.(II) Any funds not distributed under subclause (I) shall be deposited into a restricted receipts account established in the Department of Community and Economic Development to be used exclusively for grants to the county, to economic development authorities or redevelopment authorities within the county for grants for economic development projects, infrastructure projects, job training, community improvement projects, other projects in the public interest, and necessary and reasonable administrative costs. Notwithstanding the provisions of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, grants made under this clause may be utilized as local matching funds for other grants or loans from the Commonwealth.] 2% of the gross terminal revenue shall be deposited into a restricted receipts account to be established by the Commonwealth Financing Authority to be used exclusively for grant projects in the public interest to municipalities within the host county.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1823PN2245 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728